Washington statutes.
RCW 42.62.040

Rule-making authority. (Effective until January 1, 2026. Recodified as RCW 29B.35.030.)

The public disclosure commission must adopt rules in furtherance of the purpose of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter constitutes a violation under chapter 42.17A RCW, or otherwise authorizes the public disclosure commission to take action under RCW 42.17A.755.

[ 2023 c 360 s 4.]